District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Uniform Commercial Code Financing Statement Forms Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Article 9 of Subtitle I of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 28:9-521 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 28:9-521. Uniform form of written financing statement and amendment.
“Except for a reason set forth in § 28:9-516(b), a filing office that accepts written records
may not refuse to accept a written record for a filing authorized by this article if the record
conforms to a format that is:
“(1) Currently approved by the International Association of Commercial
Administrators; or
“(2) Adopted by rule issued by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to § 28:9-
526.”.
(b) Section 28:9-525(a) is amended by striking the word “Mayor” and inserting the
phrase “Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(c) Section § 28:9-526 is amended by striking the word “Mayor” both times it appears
and inserting the phrase “Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(3)).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2